Hawaii statutes.
§142-31 Administration of oath. When a
complaint is made by officers and employees as described in section 142-29(2)
to any prosecuting officer of the violation of the provisions of this chapter
and all rules adopted pursuant thereto, the officer or employee who issued the
citation and summons shall subscribe to it under oath administered by another
official of the department of agriculture whose name has been submitted to the
prosecuting officer and who has been designated by the chairperson of the board
of agriculture to administer oaths. [L 1972, c 86, pt of §1; am L 1986, c 18,
§1; gen ch 1993; am L 1997, c 62, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next